Tennessee, session 114, HB2108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-16-103(c), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) days" and substituting "thirty-five (35) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2108
012184
- 1 -